Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2516
Sections, how construed.

If any provision of sections 23-2501 to 23-2516 or of any rule, regulation or order thereunder or the application of such provision to any person or circumstances shall be held invalid, the remainder of sections 23-2501 to 23-2516 and the application of such provision of sections 23-2501 to 23-2516 or of such rule, regulation or order to persons or circumstances other than those as to which it is held invalid shall not be affected thereby.

Laws 1971, LB 921, § 16.